test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-a_22odd_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    app: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun -  - ei tsekattu : # Noun '' - ei tsekattu
  
     loistaava+a+Sg+Nom: loistaava
     loistaava+a+Sg+Gen: loistaavan
     loistaava+a+Sg+Par: loistaavaa
     loistaava+a+Sg+Tra: loistaavaksi
     loistaava+a+Sg+abe: loistaavatta
     loistaava+a+Sg+Ine: loistaavassa
     loistaava+a+Sg+Ela: loistaavasta
     loistaava+a+Sg+Ill: loistavhaan
     loistaava+a+Sg+ade: loistaavalla
     loistaava+a+Sg+abl: loistaavalta
     loistaava+a+Sg+all: loistaavalle
     loistaava+a+Sg+Ess: loistaavanna
     
     loistaava+a+Pl+Nom: loistaavat
     loistaava+a+Pl+Gen: [loistaaviitten, loistaavitten]
     loistaava+a+Pl+Par: loistaaviita
     loistaava+a+Pl+Tra: loistaaviksi
     loistaava+a+Pl+abe: loistaavitta
     loistaava+a+Pl+Ine: loistaavissa
     loistaava+a+Pl+Ela: loistaavista
     loistaava+a+Pl+Ill: loistaavhiin
     loistaava+a+Pl+ade: loistaavilla
     loistaava+a+Pl+abl: loistaavilta
     loistaava+a+Pl+all: loistaaville
     loistaava+a+Pl+Com: loistaavine
     loistaava+a+Pl+Ess: loistaavinna
     
     loistaava+a+Sg+Comp+Nom: loistaavampi
     loistaava+a+Sg+Comp+Gen: loistaavamman
     loistaava+a+Sg+Comp+Par: loistaavamppaa
     loistaava+a+Sg+Comp+Tra: loistaavammaksi
     loistaava+a+Sg+Comp+abe: loistaavammatta
     loistaava+a+Sg+Comp+Ine: loistaavammassa
     loistaava+a+Sg+Comp+Ela: loistaavammasta
     loistaava+a+Sg+Comp+Ill: loistaavamphaan
     loistaava+a+Sg+Comp+ade: loistaavammala
     loistaava+a+Sg+Comp+abl: loistaavammalta
     loistaava+a+Sg+Comp+all: loistaavammale
     loistaava+a+Sg+Comp+Ess: loistaavampana
     
     loistaava+a+Pl+Comp+Nom: loistaavammat
     loistaava+a+Pl+Comp+Gen: loistaavammiitten
     loistaava+a+Pl+Comp+Par: loistaavamppiita
     loistaava+a+Pl+Comp+Tra: loistaavammiksi
     loistaava+a+Pl+Comp+abe: loistaavammitta
     loistaava+a+Pl+Comp+Ine: loistaavammissa
     loistaava+a+Pl+Comp+Ela: loistaavammista
     loistaava+a+Pl+Comp+Ill: loistaavamphiin
     loistaava+a+Pl+Comp+ade: loistaavammila
     loistaava+a+Pl+Comp+abl: loistaavammilta
     loistaava+a+Pl+Comp+all: loistaavammile
     loistaava+a+Pl+Comp+Ess: loistaavampina
     loistaava+a+Pl+Comp+Com: loistaavampine
     
     loistaava+a+Sg+Superl+Nom: loistaaviin
     loistaava+a+Sg+Superl+Gen: loistaaviiman
     loistaava+a+Sg+Superl+Par: loistaaviinta
     loistaava+a+Sg+Superl+Tra: loistaaviimaksi
     loistaava+a+Sg+Superl+abe: loistaaviimatta
     loistaava+a+Sg+Superl+Ine: loistaaviimassa
     loistaava+a+Sg+Superl+Ela: loistaaviimasta
     loistaava+a+Sg+Superl+Ill: loistaaviimphaan
     loistaava+a+Sg+Superl+ade: loistaaviimala
     loistaava+a+Sg+Superl+abl: loistaaviimalta
     loistaava+a+Sg+Superl+all: loistaaviimale
     loistaava+a+Sg+Superl+Ess: loistaaviimpana
     
     loistaava+a+Pl+Superl+Nom: loistaaviimat
     loistaava+a+Pl+Superl+Gen: loistaaviimiitten
     loistaava+a+Pl+Superl+Par: loistaaviimppiita
     loistaava+a+Pl+Superl+Tra: loistaaviimiksi
     loistaava+a+Pl+Superl+abe: loistaaviimitta
     loistaava+a+Pl+Superl+Ine: loistaaviimissa
     loistaava+a+Pl+Superl+Ela: loistaaviimista
     loistaava+a+Pl+Superl+Ill: loistaaviimphiin
     loistaava+a+Pl+Superl+ade: loistaaviimila
     loistaava+a+Pl+Superl+abl: loistaaviimilta
     loistaava+a+Pl+Superl+all: loistaaviimile
     loistaava+a+Pl+Superl+Ess: loistaaviimpina
     loistaava+a+Pl+Superl+Com: loistaaviimpine
